Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.485

Underground electric and communication facilities, installation or conversion to—Recording of underground utility installations.

All installations of underground utilities made on and after August 9, 1971 shall be recorded on an "as constructed" map and filed with the county engineer of the county in which the underground utilities are installed.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 103 s 4.]